Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB486.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 150.023 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The members of the commission shall meet in Frankfort, quarterly, upon a date to
be determined and fixed by the commissioner, or as often as may be necessary for
the transaction of business, upon reasonable notice to each member of such
meetings. Committees created by the commission may meet as often as necessary to
conduct their assigned business at locations throughout the Commonwealth.
Committees must provide public notice of each meeting including date, time, and
location information. Public notice shall be provided no less than seven (7) days
before the meeting date.
(2) The commission shall at all times keep a watchful eye upon the Department of Fish
and Wildlife Resources, and advise the commissioner to take such action as may be
beneficial to the department and in the interest of wildlife and conservation of
natural resources.
(3) The commissioner, with the approval of the commission, shall authorize such
scientific and other studies as he or she deems necessary, and shall collect, classify
and disseminate such statistics, data and information as in his or her discretion will
tend to promote the objects of this chapter.
(4) The commissioner, with the approval of the commission, shall have the exclusive
power to expend for the protection, conservation, propagation and restoration, and
taking and harvesting of all wildlife all funds of the state acquired for the
protection, conservation, propagation or restoration of all wildlife arising from
licenses, gifts or otherwise.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/10/2025 10:54 AM Jacketed